District of Columbia statutes.
29-105.06

Noncomplying name of foreign entity.

(a)

A registered foreign entity whose name does not comply with § 29-103.01 for an entity of its type shall not register to do business in the District until it adopts, for the purpose of doing business in the District, an alternate name that complies with § 29-103.01. A registered foreign entity that registers under an alternate name under this subsection need not comply with subchapter I-C of Chapter 48 of Title 47. After registering to do business in the District with an alternate name, a registered foreign entity may do business in the District under:

(1)

The alternate name;

(2)

Its entity name, with the addition of its jurisdiction of formation clearly identified; or

(3)

An assumed or fictitious name the entity is authorized to use under subchapter I-C of Chapter 48 of Title 47.

(b)

If a registered foreign entity changes its name to one that does not comply with § 29-103.01, it shall not do business in the District until it complies with subsection (a) of this section by amending its registration to adopt an alternate name that complies with § 29-103.01.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(33), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-103.04, § 29-105.03, and § 29-105.10.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “registered foreign entity” for “foreign filing entity or foreign limited liability partnership” throughout the section.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.